Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.210

Violations—Injunctions—Assurance of discontinuance—Civil and criminal penalties—Chapter nonexclusive.

(1) The attorney general or director may bring an action in the name of the state against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets. The prevailing party may in the discretion of the court recover the costs of such action including a reasonable attorneys' fee.

(2) Every person who shall violate the terms of any injunction issued as in this chapter provided shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars.

(3) Every person who violates RCW 19.100.020, 19.100.080, 19.100.150, and 19.100.170 shall forfeit a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each violation.

(4) For the purpose of this section the superior court issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued and in such cases the attorney general or director acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties.

(5) In the enforcement of this chapter, the attorney general or director may accept an assurance of discontinuance with the provisions of this chapter from any person deemed by the attorney general or director in violation hereof. Any such assurance shall be in writing, shall state that the person giving such assurance does not admit to any violation of this chapter or to any facts alleged by the attorney general or director, and shall be filed with and subject to the approval of the superior court of the county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Thurston county. Proof of failure to comply with the assurance of discontinuance shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this chapter.

(6) Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter or who willfully violates any rule adopted or order issued under this chapter is guilty of a class B felony and shall upon conviction be fined not more than five thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than ten years or both, but no person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order if he or she proves that he or she had no knowledge of the rule or order. No indictment or information may be returned under this chapter more than five years after the alleged violation.

(7) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime by statute or at common law.

[ 2003 c 53 s 151; 1980 c 63 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 13 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 116 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 21.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.